Wyoming statutes. Title 30 Mines and Minerals
Chapter 1 General Provisions

Substantial compliance with law sufficient to make claims.—

Under the doctrine of pedis possessio, a trial court may depart from the strict requirements of actual physical possession of the properties in question and give recognition to the theory of a mining company that it could make claim to a large number of claims provided that it substantially complied with the requirements of the law. Continental Oil Co. v. Natrona Service, Inc., 588 F.2d 792, 1978 U.S. App. LEXIS 7078 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1978).

Meaning of “pedis possessio.” —

Under the doctrine of pedis possessio, the party who makes the first discovery of valuable minerals and who substantially complies with the location requirements of this chapter is entitled to the exclusive possession of the lands covered by the claim so long as the claimant continues in possession and performs the annual assessment work or the annual assessment work has been suspended during litigation. Continental Oil Co. v. Natrona Service, Inc., 588 F.2d 792, 1978 U.S. App. LEXIS 7078 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1978).

Law reviews. —

For address on procedure in locating and patenting a mining claim, see 14 Wyo. L.J. 123 (1960).

For an address on examination of title to mining claims, see 14 Wyo. L.J. 139 (1960).

See note, “Placer or Lode and First Locator Protection,” 15 Wyo. L.J. 176 (1961).

See article, “Fee Royalty Conveyancing in Wyoming,” II Land & Water L. Rev. 117 (1967).

See article, “Mining Law in a Nuclear Age: The Wyoming Example,” III Land & Water L. Rev. 1, 319 (1968).

See article, “Mineral Exploration Funds,” IV Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1969).

See article, “Possessory Interests in Wyoming Mining Claims,” IV Land & Water L. Rev. 337 (1969).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

54 Am. Jur. 2d Mines and Minerals §§ 25 to 100.

Open-pit mining, conveyance of minerals as including minerals removable only by, 1 ALR2d 787.

Cotenant's accountability for minerals removed from property, basis of computation, 5 ALR2d 1368.

Trespasser's right to credit for expenditures in producing, as against his liability for value of, oil or minerals, 21 ALR2d 380.

Power's duties and accounting responsibilities of managing partner of mining partnership, 24 ALR2d 1359.

Loss by nonuser of private easement as to mineral and quarry rights, 25 ALR2d 1265.

Construction and effect of provision in mineral lease excusing payment of minimum rent or royalty, 28 ALR2d 1013.

Condemnor's acquisition of, or right to, minerals under land taken in eminent domain, 36 ALR2d 1424.

Rights of lessee to minerals extracted during the lease but remaining on the premises after its termination, 51 ALR2d 1121.

Validity of tax redemption statute as applied to separate mineral estate, 56 ALR2d 621.

Streets, alleys or parks; relative rights, as between municipality and abutting landowners, to minerals, oil and gas underlying, 62 ALR2d 1311.

Grant, reservation or exception as creating separate and independent legal estate in solid minerals or as passing only incorporeal privilege or license, 66 ALR2d 978.

Geophysical or seismograph exploration or survey not authorized, recovery in case of, 67 ALR2d 444.

Real or personal property, solid mineral royalty as, 68 ALR2d 732.

Grubstake contracts, 70 ALR2d 904.

Lessee's implied obligation to conduct search for, or to develop or work premises for, minerals other than oil and gas, 76 ALR2d 721.

Duty of lessee or assignee of mineral lease other than lease for oil and gas, as regards marketing or delivery for marketing of mineral products, 77 ALR2d 1058.

Right of owner of title to or interest in minerals under one tract to use passages therein or surface in connection with mining other tract, 83 ALR2d 665.

When is representation of applicant's interest by existing parties inadequate and applicant bound by judgment so as to be entitled to intervention as of right, in action involving title to land, water, or mineral rights, under Federal Rule 24(A)(2) and similar state statutes or rules, 84 A.L.R.2d 1412.

Construction and effect of provision for payment of damages to “crops” or “growing crops” in mineral deed or lease, or in conveyance of pipeline or other underground easement, 87 ALR2d 235.

Payment of stipulated minimum royalties or annual rental under solid mineral lease as precluding lessor's claim of forfeiture or abandonment, 87 ALR2d 1076.

Reservation or exception in deed as to mineral rights in favor of stranger, 88 ALR2d 1199.

“Mine” as used in written instrument, 92 ALR2d 868.

Clay, sand or gravel as “minerals” within deed, lease or license, 95 A.L.R.2d 843.

Guardian's power to make lease for infant ward beyond minority or term of guardianship as affected by statute governing oil, gas and mineral leases in Indian territory, 6 ALR3d 570.

Prohibiting or regulating removal or exploitation of oil and gas, minerals, soil or other natural products within municipal limits, 10 ALR3d 1226.

Grant, lease, exception or reservation of “oil, gas and other minerals,” or the like, as including coal or metallic ores, 59 ALR3d 1146.

Grant, reservation or lease of minerals and mining rights as including, without expressly so providing, the right to remove the minerals by surface mining, 70 ALR3d 383.

Validity and construction of statutes regulating strip mining, 86 ALR3d 27.

Implied duty of oil and gas lessee to protect against drainage, 18 ALR4th 14.

Remedy for breach of implied duty of oil and gas lessee to protect against drainage, 18 ALR4th 147.

Mine tailings as real or personal property, 75 ALR4th 965.

Judicial review of interior department decisions affecting claims of mineral interests in public lands, 5 ALR Fed 566.

Necessity and sufficiency of environmental impact statements under § 102(2)(C) of National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 USC § 4332(2)(C)) in cases involving logging, mining and related projects, 74 ALR Fed 702.

58 C.J.S. Mines and Minerals §§ 1, 2.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
201.06 (Matthew Bender).

§ 30-1-101.
Recording mining claims required; requisites of certificate.

A discoverer of any mineral lead, lode, ledge or vein shall, within ninety (90) days from the date of discovery, cause the claim to be recorded in the office of the county clerk of the county within which the claim may exist, by a location certificate which shall contain the following facts:

The name of the lode claim;

The name or names of the locator or locators;

The date of location;

The length of the claim and the general course of the vein as far as it is known;

The amount of surface ground claimed;

A description of the claim by such designation of natural or fixed object, or if upon ground surveyed by the United States system of land survey, by reference to section or quarter section corners, as shall identify the claim beyond question.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 40, § 15; 1890-91, ch. 46, § 1; 1895, ch. 108, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 2546; C.S. 1910, § 3467; C.S. 1920, § 4390; R.S. 1931, § 70-114; C.S. 1945, § 57-914; W.S. 1957, § 30-1; Laws 1981, ch. 91, § 1; 2004, ch. 88, § 1; 2009, ch. 168, § 206.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in the introductory paragraph of (a), substituted “ninety (90) days” for “sixty (60) days.”

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), deleted “and ex officio register of deeds” following “office of the county clerk.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 325, appropriates $45,000 from the general fund to the legislative service office to be used to establish and support a joint executive-legislative committee on split estates to study issues and draft legislation to modernize Wyoming statutes with respect to estates in which the mineral rights and surface rights are held by different parties. The committee will consist of 11 members, five of whom will be appointed by the governor, including two owners who own and occupy a surface estate underlain by leased oil or gas minerals, at least one of whom does not also own the mineral rights to the property, one owner of private mineral interests of a split estate, and two members representing oil or gas producers operating in Wyoming plus three members of the house of representatives and three members of the senate. State agencies must provide information and other support to the committee as requested. The legislative service office will staff the committee, which will meet as necessary and report to the joint judiciary interim committee its recommendations for statutory changes not later than November 1, 2004. The committee may request the presence of and hear testimony from any person relating to the subject of split estates, specifically including but not limited to representatives of the oil and gas industry, private landowners affected by split estates, private mineral estate owners affected by split estates, a state with an accommodation doctrine in its state laws, the banking industry and rural land appraisers.

Laws 2004, ch. 95, §§ 325(d) and 400, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

Purpose of recording mining claim location certificates. —

In the absence of a contrary statement by the legislature, the primary purpose of requiring mining claim location certificates to be recorded is the imparting of permanent constructive notice concerning the acts claimed to have been performed by the locator. Globe Mining Co. v. Anderson, 78 Wyo. 17, 318 P.2d 373,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1957).

The location certificates on record take the place of the location notices, rendering proof of the posting of the notices unnecessary as against adverse claimants. The purpose to be thus served would seem to be predicated upon the possibility that the boundary markers, just as the posted notice, may very likely be lost or destroyed on the ground. Under such circumstances, constructive notice is provided by the location certificate to be recorded in accordance with this section. Rasmussen Drilling, Inc. v. Kerr-McGee Nuclear Corp., 571 F.2d 1144, 1978 U.S. App. LEXIS 13018 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 439 U.S. 862, 99 S. Ct. 183, 58 L. Ed. 2d 171, 1978 U.S. LEXIS 3076 (U.S. 1978).

Meaning of “survey.” —

The “survey” referred to in subsection (a)(vi) means a completed survey by proper federal authorities, and does not include a survey which has not been approved. Slothower v. Hunter, 15 Wyo. 189, 88 P. 36,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1906).

Protection afforded by recordation of certificate. —

The recording of lode mining location certificates in the proper county clerk's office will of itself suffice to give the locator and discoverer all protections which are entailed by making them of record. State ex rel. Blonder v. Goodbrod, 77 Wyo. 126, 307 P.2d 1073,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1957).

Recorded certificates take place of notices of location. —

Where location certificates of mining claims are on record several years prior to the attempted location of adverse claims, they take the place of the location notices, and render proof of the posting of the notices unnecessary as against adverse claimants. Bergquist v. West Virginia-Wyoming Copper Co., 18 Wyo. 234, 106 P. 673,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1910).

Prime requisites for establishment of valid possessory title

to a lode and/or placer mining claim are the discovery of a valuable mineral, the distinct marking on the ground of the boundaries, the actual taking of possession of the claim and the performance of the requisite amount of development work. Rasmussen Drilling, Inc. v. Kerr-McGee Nuclear Corp., 571 F.2d 1144, 1978 U.S. App. LEXIS 13018 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 439 U.S. 862, 99 S. Ct. 183, 58 L. Ed. 2d 171, 1978 U.S. LEXIS 3076 (U.S. 1978).

Careful, thorough inspection of ground required

to ascertain whether any statutory steps have been previously undertaken before valid lode claim established. Rasmussen Drilling, Inc. v. Kerr-McGee Nuclear Corp., 571 F.2d 1144, 1978 U.S. App. LEXIS 13018 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 439 U.S. 862, 99 S. Ct. 183, 58 L. Ed. 2d 171, 1978 U.S. LEXIS 3076 (U.S. 1978).

The issue of good faith in filing location certificates

involves an inquiry into the intent of the locator. United States. United States v. Zweifel, 508 F.2d 1150, 1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 16603 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 829, 96 S. Ct. 47, 46 L. Ed. 2d 46, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 2367 (U.S. 1975).

Improper location or recordation casts cloud on title. —

Location and recordation of claims on unappropriated public land without actual discovery of valuable minerals, or recordation without marking the claim in compliance with federal and state law casts a cloud on the title of the United States. United States. United States v. Zweifel, 508 F.2d 1150, 1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 16603 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 829, 96 S. Ct. 47, 46 L. Ed. 2d 46, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 2367 (U.S. 1975).

Erroneous recordation pursuant to mining district regulation.—

The district court committed error in granting a writ of mandamus to compel a recorder of a mining district to record a lode mining certificate pursuant to a regulation adopted by the district under § 57-901, W.C.S. 1945, prior to its repeal, since such regulation was contrary to this section requiring such certificate to be recorded at the office of the county clerk. State ex rel. Blonder v. Goodbrod, 77 Wyo. 126, 307 P.2d 1073,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1957).

Effect of proper location and recordation. —

If one locates, marks and records his claim in accordance with federal and state law, he has an exclusive right of possession to the extent of his claim as located, with the right to extract the minerals without paying any royalty to the United States as owner, and without ever applying for a patent or seeking to obtain title to the fee. United States. United States v. Zweifel, 508 F.2d 1150, 1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 16603 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 829, 96 S. Ct. 47, 46 L. Ed. 2d 46, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 2367 (U.S. 1975).

Right cannot be initiated by trespass. —

It is a general rule that a mining location, to be valid, must be good when made, and that a right cannot be initiated by a trespass. Phillips v. Brill, 17 Wyo. 26, 95 P. 856,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1908).

Knowledge of claims precludes taking advantage of defects inrecorded claims. —

Defendants could not take advantage of defects in recorded claims of plaintiff where defendants had actual knowledge of claims, consulted the county records, traced some of the boundaries on the ground and saw certain stakes, notices and workings. Globe Mining Co. v. Anderson, 78 Wyo. 17, 318 P.2d 373,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1957).

Effect of actual notice of claim. —

The function of recording the location notice in the office of the county clerk is that of giving constructive notice, and one who has actual notice will not be heard to complain, even if no recordings have been made in the county records. One who has actual notice may not rely upon or take advantage of defects in recordation. Rasmussen Drilling, Inc. v. Kerr-McGee Nuclear Corp., 571 F.2d 1144, 1978 U.S. App. LEXIS 13018 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 439 U.S. 862, 99 S. Ct. 183, 58 L. Ed. 2d 171, 1978 U.S. LEXIS 3076 (U.S. 1978).

In a pedis possessio conflict between two locators of lode mining claims, the better title prevails.

MacGuire v. Sturgis, 347 F. Supp. 580, 1971 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13022 (D. Wyo. 1971).

No estoppel. —

Even if the person making discovery for defendants was estopped, by reason of conveyance to them, in denying the validity of his former location, his employment by defendants to make the discovery and location on the same claim did not bring them into privity with him, so as to estop them by his conveyance, there being no evidence of fraud by defendants; nor does fact that such person was a stockholder in the company to which the claim was conveyed estop the company from claiming the benefit of his discovery. Whiting v. Straup, 17 Wyo. 1, 95 P. 849,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1908).

Only recording with county clerk required. —

The presence at one time in this section of a provision requiring the recording of a lode claim with the recorder of the mining district and its absence now would seem to indicate a legislative purpose that but a single recording of the certificates in the usual office of record — the county clerk and ex officio register of deeds — shall be made. State ex rel. Blonder v. Goodbrod, 77 Wyo. 126, 307 P.2d 1073,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1957).

Effect of failure to record within prescribed period. —

Failure to record a location certificate within the period prescribed by this section, i.e., 60 days from the date of discovery does not render the certificate invalid or void. Rasmussen Drilling, Inc. v. Kerr-McGee Nuclear Corp., 571 F.2d 1144, 1978 U.S. App. LEXIS 13018 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 439 U.S. 862, 99 S. Ct. 183, 58 L. Ed. 2d 171, 1978 U.S. LEXIS 3076 (U.S. 1978).

As courts liberal with good faith locators. —

Where a mining locator attempts, in good faith, to comply with the law, courts are inclined to be liberal in construing his acts so as not to defeat his claim by technical criticism. Rasmussen Drilling, Inc. v. Kerr-McGee Nuclear Corp., 571 F.2d 1144, 1978 U.S. App. LEXIS 13018 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 439 U.S. 862, 99 S. Ct. 183, 58 L. Ed. 2d 171, 1978 U.S. LEXIS 3076 (U.S. 1978); Continental Oil Co. v. Natrona Service, Inc., 588 F.2d 792, 1978 U.S. App. LEXIS 7078 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1978).

Failure to record a certificate of a mining location within 60 days as required by this section does not vitiate the certificate, the only effect of the failure being that it may affect intervening rights. Slothower v. Hunter, 15 Wyo. 189, 88 P. 36,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1906).

When “discovery” made. —

When the locator finds rock in place containing mineral, he has made a discovery within the meaning of the statute, whether it assays high or low. Western Standard Uranium Co. v. Thurston, 355 P.2d 377,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1960).

Completion of location. —

Mining claim location may be made by an agent, even without knowledge of the principal, if there is local rule authorizing it, or subsequent ratification, and where one had entered on land and performed the acts necessary for a valid location of a placer oil claim, except making a discovery of minerals, but before any discovery thereon such person sold part of it to plaintiffs, and abandoned the other, and thereafter entered defendants' employment for the purpose of locating placer oil mining claims, and completed a valid location for defendants by making a discovery, such discovery inured to defendants' benefit. Whiting v. Straup, 17 Wyo. 1, 95 P. 849,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1908).

Ratification of location by agent. —

Where, in action to determine rights of claimants to a mining claim, defendant claims under amended certificate of location signed in the name of its attorney, by offering certificate in evidence and relying upon it, defendant ratifies the act of its agent, although he had no original authority to sign it. Bergquist v. West Virginia-Wyoming Copper Co., 18 Wyo. 234, 106 P. 673,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1910).

Amended certificate of location. —

Where a company acquires all the title of locators of a mining claim, both under an original and a subsequent location, it is competent for the company to record an additional or amended certificate of location and claim thereby an original discovery on the date of the discovery by the original locators. Bergquist v. West Virginia-Wyoming Copper Co., 18 Wyo. 234, 106 P. 673,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1910).

Construing certificate. —

Where location certificate of M claim used words “location shafts,” instead of “discovery shaft,” in giving length of claim in each direction, while the point from which the length is measured in the certificate of an adjoining claim is designated as the “location,” the certificates must be construed as intending to give the length each way from center of the discovery shaft, as required by statute. Bergquist v. West Virginia-Wyoming Copper Co., 18 Wyo. 234, 106 P. 673,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1910).

Defective certificate vests no title. —

A certificate of a mining location which fails to give the length of the claim along the vein each way from the center of the discovery shaft, or to mention the discovery shaft, is fatally bad, and vests no title in the locator. Slothower v. Hunter, 15 Wyo. 189, 88 P. 36,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1906).

Description of claim held prima facie sufficient. —

A certificate of a mining location stating that it was located in a designated mining district and county, and describing the claim as lying west of claims designated, but which did not give distances or directions, was prima facie sufficient within this section, providing that a certificate of a mining location shall contain a description of the claim by such designation of natural or fixed objects as shall identify the claim. Slothower v. Hunter, 15 Wyo. 189, 88 P. 36,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1906).

Validity of entry as to Indian lands. —

An entry under the mining laws after the expiration of the 60-day limit set by congress in an act disposing of Indian lands ceded to United States was not invalidated because the person entering same had been upon the land before expiration of the 60 days, entry being forbidden by presidential proclamation until after 60 days, and had remained upon such lands or in close proximity to them until expiration of the 60-day period. Le Clair v. Hawley, 18 Wyo. 23, 102 P. 853,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1909).

Discovery and extent of lode is question of fact. —

Whether a vein or lode has been discovered or exists within the limits of the location in controversy, and as to the continuity of ore and mineral matter constituting the length, width and extent of any particular vein or lode, is always a question of fact to be determined by a jury, or by the court, if the case is tried without a jury. Western Standard Uranium Co. v. Thurston, 355 P.2d 377,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1960).

Cited

in

MacGuire v. Sturgis, 347 F. Supp. 580, 1971 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13022 (D. Wyo. 1971); AMOCO Prod. Co. v. EM Nominee Partnership Co., 886 P.2d 265,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1994).

Law reviews. —

For note, “The Description of a Mining Claim,” see 9 Wyo. L.J. 224.

For note on Globe Mining Co. v. Anderson, 78 Wyo. 17, 318 P.2d 373,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(1957), and the mining laws, see 13 Wyo. L.J. 43 (1958).

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §§
32.03, 33.01, 33.03, 33.09 (Matthew Bender).

§ 30-1-102.
Imperfect certificates void.

Any certificate of the location of a lode claim which shall not fully contain all the requirements named in W.S.

30-1-101

, together with such other description as shall identify the lode or claim with reasonable certainty, shall be void.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 40, § 16; R.S. 1899, § 2547; C.S. 1910, § 3468; C.S. 1920, § 4391; R.S. 1931, § 70-115; C.S. 1945, § 57-915; W.S. 1957, § 30-2; 2011, ch. 176, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

substituted “W.S.

30-1-101

” for “the preceding section.”

Laws 2011, ch. 176 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

New location. —

Where the recorded location certificate of a lode mining claim has been adjudged defective and void, the claim having been otherwise properly located and considerable development work having been done, the locators may, to protect their interest, make a new location of the same ground. Bergquist v. West Virginia-Wyoming Copper Co., 18 Wyo. 234, 106 P. 673,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1910).

Cited

in

Slothower v. Hunter, 15 Wyo. 189, 88 P. 36,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1906); Globe Mining Co. v. Anderson, 78 Wyo. 17, 318 P.2d 373,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(1957).

Law reviews. —

See “The Description of a Mining Claim,” 9 Wyo. L.J. 224.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition § 33.09 (Matthew Bender).

§ 30-1-103.
Prerequisites to filing location certificates.

Before the filing of a location certificate in the office of the county clerk, the discoverer of any lode, vein or fissure shall designate the location thereof as follows:

Repealed by Laws 1981, ch. 91, § 2.

By posting at the point of discovery, on the surface, a plain sign or notice, containing the name of the lode or claim, the name of the discoverer and locator, and the date of such discovery;

By marking the surface boundaries of the claim, which shall be marked by six (6) substantial monuments of stone or posts, hewed or marked on the side or sides, which face is toward the claim, and sunk in the ground, one (1) at each corner, and one (1) at the center of each side line, and when thus marking the boundaries of a claim, if any one (1) or more of such posts or monuments of stone shall fall, by necessity, upon precipitous ground, when the proper placing of it is impracticable or dangerous to life or limb, it shall be lawful to place any such post or monument of stone at the nearest point properly marked to designate its right place; provided, that no right to such lode or claim or its possession or enjoyment, shall be given to any person or persons, unless such person or persons shall discover in said claim mineral bearing rock in place.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 40, § 17; R.S. 1899, § 2548; C.S. 1910, § 3469; C.S. 1920, § 4392; R.S. 1931, § 70-116; C.S. 1945, § 57-916; W.S. 1957, § 30-3; Laws 1981, ch. 91, § 2; 2009, ch. 168, § 206.

Cross references. —

As to manner and method of making surveys, see §§

18-3-702

,

18-3-704

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), deleted “and ex officio register of deeds” following “office of the county clerk.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Discovery need not precede other acts of location. —

Discovery of minerals within limits of a claim is essential to a valid location of a mining claim on public domain, whether it be a lode or placer claim, but such discovery need not, in absence of intervening rights, precede the other acts of location; and if made prior to any intervening rights, though subsequent to marking out boundaries and recording claim, the location, if otherwise good, will be validated from discovery date. Whiting v. Straup, 17 Wyo. 1, 95 P. 849,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1908).

Posting of notice on ground gives sufficient notice to all subsequent prospectors

of the prior locator's intent to occupy, hold and possess the ground claimed. Rasmussen Drilling, Inc. v. Kerr-McGee Nuclear Corp., 571 F.2d 1144, 1978 U.S. App. LEXIS 13018 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 439 U.S. 862, 99 S. Ct. 183, 58 L. Ed. 2d 171, 1978 U.S. LEXIS 3076 (U.S. 1978).

Location notice held in substantial compliance with section.—

Location notice reading: “We the undersigned claim by right of discovery this ledge, lode or deposit described as follows: Fifteen hundred feet in a northwesterly direction from this notice, and three hundred feet on each side of this vein,” containing also name of lode, dated and signed by locators, and posted on same date, substantially complied with statute. Columbia Copper Mining Co. v. Duchess Mining Milling & Smelting Co., 13 Wyo. 244, 79 P. 385,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1905).

Applied

in

Globe Mining Co. v. Anderson, 78 Wyo. 17, 318 P.2d 373,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(1957).

Cited

in

Western Std. Uranium Co. v. Thurston, 355 P.2d 377,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1960); Continental Oil Co. v. Natrona Serv., Inc., 588 F.2d 792,

1978 U.S. App. LEXIS 7078

(10th Cir. 1978).

Law reviews. —

For note, “Location of Mining Claims in Wyoming,” see 9 Wyo. L.J. 220.

“The Description of a Mining Claim,” 9 Wyo. L.J. 224.

“The Assessment Work Requirements,” 9 Wyo. L.J. 231.

For a note on Globe Mining Co. v. Anderson, 78 Wyo. 17, 318 P.2d 373,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(1957), and the mining laws, see 13 Wyo. L.J. 43 (1958).

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §§
32.03, 33.01, 33.03, 33.04 (Matthew Bender).

§ 30-1-104.
Additional location certificate to be filed upon change of surface boundaries or addition of new territory.

Whenever it shall be apprehended by the locator, or his assigns, of any mining claims or property heretofore or hereafter located, that his or their original location certificate was defective, erroneous, or that the requirements of the law had not been complied with before the filing thereof, or shall be desirous of changing the surface boundaries of his or their original claim or location, or of taking in any part of an overlapping claim or location which has been abandoned, such locator or locators, or his or their assigns, may file an additional location certificate in compliance with and subject to the provisions of this act [§§

30-1-101

through

30-1-126

]; provided, however, that such relocation shall not infringe upon the rights of others existing at the time of such relocation, and that no such relocation, or other record thereof, shall preclude the claimant or claimants from proving any such title or titles as he or they may have held under any previous location.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 40, § 7; R.S. 1899, § 2538; C.S. 1910, § 3459; C.S. 1920, § 4382; R.S. 1931, § 70-106; C.S. 1945, § 57-906; W.S. 1957, § 30-4.

Cross references. —

As to duty of county surveyor to survey underground workings of mines, see §

30-2-409

.

No relocation until title under valid location reverts. —

Land on which valid mining location has been made is segregated from the public domain, and until some act or laches of the locator occurs by which the title reverts to the government, it cannot be relocated. Slothower v. Hunter, 15 Wyo. 189, 88 P. 36,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1906).

Excessive locations are valid except as to the excess.

Chittim v. Belle Fourche Bentonite Products Co., 60 Wyo. 235, 149 P.2d 142,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1944).

Relocation by former locators to cure defect. —

Where mining claim has not been abandoned but has been improved by original locators or their assigns, and because of a defect in location certificate, claim is relocated, the former locators, or another for their benefit, have a right to protect their interest by making a new location, there being no failure on the part of those in possession to perform the required development work. Bergquist v. West Virginia-Wyoming Copper Co., 18 Wyo. 234, 106 P. 673,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1910).

Amendment of location certificate will relate back to original certificate

so as to perfect the location. It cannot, however, cut off valid rights which may have been acquired by a subsequent locator. Rasmussen Drilling, Inc. v. Kerr-McGee Nuclear Corp., 571 F.2d 1144, 1978 U.S. App. LEXIS 13018 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 439 U.S. 862, 99 S. Ct. 183, 58 L. Ed. 2d 171, 1978 U.S. LEXIS 3076 (U.S. 1978).

Application of section proviso relating to existing rights.—

The proviso in this section as to existing rights does not relate to amendments of mere defects or errors, but applies only where the boundaries are changed so as to take in territory not before included within the claim. Hagerman v. Thompson, 68 Wyo. 515, 235 P.2d 750,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1951).

Recital of relocation is admission of former claim. —

A recital in a certificate of a mining location that it is “a relocation of” an abandoned location is an admission that a former claim once had legal existence, and former claimant, purchasing rights of second locator, can claim rights under his purchase only on theory that former claim had been abandoned. Slothower v. Hunter, 15 Wyo. 189, 88 P. 36,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1906).

Amendment by assignee. —

A successor to the interest of original locators of an oil claim is entitled to amend the original or file an additional certificate showing the date of discovery made before the attachment of intervening rights. Dean v. Omaha-Wyoming Oil Co., 21 Wyo. 133, 128 P. 881,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 21 Wyo. 133, 128 P. 881,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1913).

Retaking of an oil claim or giving it a name is not essential to the validity of an amendment of the certificate made by an assignee of the original locators on the discovery of mineral. Dean v. Omaha-Wyoming Oil Co., 21 Wyo. 133, 128 P. 881,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 21 Wyo. 133, 128 P. 881,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1913).

Original and amended certificates construed together. —

Where an amended certificate of location of an oil claim is filed as authorized by this section, before intervening rights have attached, original and the amended certificates must be construed together, and if, when so construed, they are sufficient, the location record will be held valid. Dean v. Omaha-Wyoming Oil Co., 21 Wyo. 133, 128 P. 881,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 21 Wyo. 133, 128 P. 881,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1913).

The original location certificate of a mining claim and an amended certificate, if one be filed, must be construed together, and, if sufficient when so construed, the location record will be valid, although neither standing alone would be sufficient. The amended certificate, if filed, relates back to the date of the original location. Hagerman v. Thompson, 68 Wyo. 515, 235 P.2d 750,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1951).

Facts showing discovery. —

Where original discoverers and locators of a lode have sunk shaft on the claim, and each one knows of the existence of mineral-bearing rock in place in that shaft, and at a point where they posted a notice, such facts sufficiently show a discovery to support a new location by them at time of posting notice. Bergquist v. West Virginia-Wyoming Copper Co., 18 Wyo. 234, 106 P. 673,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1910).

Original boundaries may be adopted. —

Where mining claim is relocated by the original locators, the boundaries of the relocation need not be marked, as required for original location, where boundaries of original location are marked and identified, as the locator may adopt the original markings and boundaries, even though §

30-1-109

contains an express permission to adopt old boundaries only in case of an abandoned claim. Bergquist v. West Virginia-Wyoming Copper Co., 18 Wyo. 234, 106 P. 673,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1910).

Failure to prove remarking of boundaries. —

Where certificate to original bentonite placer mining claim for 60 acres by defendant's predecessors was amended to exclude 40 acres merely because original location included some ground not open to location, plaintiffs were not entitled to judgment for defendant's failure to prove boundaries were remarked to conform to relocation. Chittim v. Belle Fourche Bentonite Products Co., 60 Wyo. 235, 149 P.2d 142,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1944).

Purpose of posting notice of location of mining claims and marking boundaries

is designed to inform others who may wish to locate claims on the same lands of the prior actions, and those with such knowledge cannot prevail in a quiet title action predicated upon the first locator's failure to properly describe quarter sections and failure to affix a special name to a claim in the location certificate. Rasmussen Drilling, Inc. v. Kerr-McGee Nuclear Corp., 571 F.2d 1144, 1978 U.S. App. LEXIS 13018 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 439 U.S. 862, 99 S. Ct. 183, 58 L. Ed. 2d 171, 1978 U.S. LEXIS 3076 (U.S. 1978).

Law reviews. —

See “The Description of a Mining Claim,” 9 Wyo. L.J. 224.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition § 3801, 38.02 (Matthew Bender).

§ 30-1-105.
Location certificates shall describe but 1 claim.

No location certificate shall contain more than one (1) claim or location, whether the location be made by one (1) or more locators, and any location certificate that contains upon its face more than one (1) location claim shall be absolutely void, except as to the first location named and described therein, and in case more than one (1) claim or location is described together so that the first one (1) cannot be distinguished from the others, the certificate of location shall be void as an entirety.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 40, § 8; R.S. 1899, § 2539; C.S. 1910, § 3460; C.S. 1920, § 4383; R.S. 1931, § 70-107; C.S. 1945, § 57-907; W.S. 1957, § 30-5.

Notices intended only to change groupings did not constituteabandonment of claims. —

Notices of location which, by grouping of claims and acreage amounts, were rendered illegal as original notices under this section and 30 USCS § 36 were seemingly intended only to change groupings and amounts in prior valid notices of same claims and did not constitute abandonment of latter. Simmons v. Muir, 75 Wyo. 44, 291 P.2d 810,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1955).

Applied

in

Western Std. Uranium Co. v. Thurston, 355 P.2d 377,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1960).

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition § 33.09 (Matthew Bender).

§§ 30-1-106 and 30-1-107.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1981, ch. 91, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1888, ch. 40, §§ 18 and 19, related to opens cuts, discovery shafts and drilled holes.

§ 30-1-108.
Locators' rights of possession and enjoyment; “mineral boundaries” defined.

The locators of all mining locations heretofore made, or which shall hereafter be made, on any mineral vein, lode or ledge, situated on the public domain, their heirs and assigns, shall have the exclusive right of possession and enjoyment of all the surface included within the lines of their locations, and of all veins, lodes and ledges throughout their entire depth, the top or apex of which lies inside of surface lines extended downward vertically although such veins, lodes, or ledges may so far depart from a perpendicular in their course downward as to extend outside the vertical side lines of such surface locations. But their right of possession to such outside parts of such veins or ledges shall be confined to such portions thereof as lie between vertical planes drawn downward as above described, through the end lines of their locations, so continued in their own direction that such planes will intersect such exterior parts of such veins or ledges. And nothing in this section shall authorize a locator or possessor of a vein or lode which extends in it downward course beyond the vertical lines of his claim to enter upon the surface of a claim owned or possessed by another.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 40, § 20; R.S. 1899, § 2551; C.S. 1910, § 3472; C.S. 1920, § 4395; R.S. 1931, § 70-119; C.S. 1945, § 57-919; W.S. 1957, § 30-8.

Cross references. —

As to surveys of underground workings, see notes to §

30-1-104

.

Law reviews. —

See “Location of Mining Claims in Wyoming,” 9 Wyo. L.J. 220.